Missouri, session 2026, HB2918.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 171 and 173, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 171.200 and 173.1551, to read as follows:
171.200. 1. This section and section 173.1551 shall be known and may be cited as
the "Cronkite Journalistic Standards and New Voices Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Cronkite Journalistic Standards", the following standards required of a
news source:
(a) The news source adheres to the objectivity norm, which requires:
a. Separating news and commentary;
b. Prioritizing verification over speed;
c. Ensuring any personal imprint on facts being reported is minimal; and
d. Serving the public rather than the newsroom brand;
(b) At least fifty-one percent of the material in the news source constitutes
"news", defined as material that presents only facts without hearsay or anonymous
quotes, relies only on sources that have been verified, presents both sides of a position,
and excludes any language that colors the perception of the consumer;
(c) Commentary and editorial material constitute ten percent or less of the news
source;
(d) Any commentary in the news section of the news source is clearly identified
and separated from the news article or material;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2918 2
(e) Before publication of the news source, the fairness doctrine, which required
broadcasters to afford reasonable opportunity for the discussion of conflicting views on
issues of public importance, is considered for guidance in upholding the Cronkite
Journalistic Standards. This subdivision shall not be construed to require adherence to
the fairness doctrine; and
(f) The news source is not perceived or deemed to have supported or opposed
any subject covered, as determined from the perspective of a reasonable consumer of
the news source;
(2) "School-sponsored media", any material that is prepared, substantially
written, published, or broadcast by a student journalist at a public high school;
distributed or generally made available to members of the student body; and prepared
under the direction of a student-media advisor. "School-sponsored media" does not
include any media intended for distribution or transmission solely in the classroom in
which the media is produced;
(3) "Student journalist", a public high school student who gathers, compiles,
writes, edits, photographs, records, produces, or prepares content for dissemination in
school-sponsored media;
(4) "Student-media advisor", an individual employed, appointed, or designated
by a school district to supervise or provide instruction relating to school-sponsored
media.
3. Subject to the provisions of this section, the freedom of the press in school-
sponsored media shall be protected. A student journalist has the right to exercise
freedom of speech and of the press in school-sponsored media. Material in school-
sponsored media shall not be suppressed solely because it involves political or
controversial subject matter.
4. School districts and student-media advisors may regulate the number, length,
frequency, and format of school-sponsored media. Review of material prepared for
school-sponsored media and encouragement of the expression of such material in a
manner that is consistent with professional standards of English and journalism shall
not be deemed to be or construed as an abridgement of the right to freedom of
expression in school-sponsored media or a restraint on publication of the material
therein.
5. A school district shall not authorize any prior restraint of any school-
sponsored media except if the administration or student-media advisor reasonably
determines or anticipates that the media:
(1) Is libelous or slanderous;
(2) Constitutes an invasion of privacy;

HCS HB 2918 3
(3) Violates federal or state law;
(4) Is a threat of violence;
(5) Advertises a product or service that is illegal or is not permitted to be sold to
minors by law;
(6) Violates the rights of others;
(7) Is likely to incite students to commit an unlawful act or to violate school
district policy or procedure; or
(8) Is likely to materially and substantially disrupt or interfere with the orderly
operation of the school.
6. Subject to the limitations imposed by this section, student journalists are
responsible for determining the news, opinion, and advertising content of school-
sponsored media. Student-media advisors are responsible for teaching and encouraging
free and responsible expression of material and professional standards of English and
journalism. No student-media advisor shall be disciplined, terminated from
employment, transferred, or relieved of duties imposed under this subsection for
refusal to abridge or infringe upon the right to freedom of expression conferred by this
section.
7. No publication or other expression of matter by students in the exercise of
rights under this section shall be deemed to be an expression of a school district's policy.
No school district, member of the board of education, student-media advisor, or
employee of a school district shall be held liable in any civil or criminal action for any
publication or other expression of matter by student journalists in the exercise of rights
under this section except to the extent that such persons or entities actively participated
in the conduct that is the subject of the civil or criminal action or knew of the conduct
and failed to take timely action to prevent or withdraw such publication or expression
that is the subject of the civil or criminal action. A student journalist who has attained
the age of majority may be held liable in any civil or criminal action for material
expressed in student publications to the extent of such student journalist's responsibility
for and involvement in the preparation and publication of such matter.
8. Each school district shall adopt a written policy regarding the freedom of the
press and expression by students in accordance with this section. The policy shall
include reasonable provisions for the time, place, and manner of student expression.
The policy may also include limitations regarding language that may be defined as
vulgar, obscene, offensively lewd, profane, harassing, threatening, or intimidating.
9. School-sponsored media shall not be protected under this section unless the
media is a news source that conforms to the Cronkite Journalistic Standards.

HCS HB 2918 4
10. Commentary and editorial content in school-sponsored media shall be
protected under this section as long as the content appears in a news source that
conforms to the Cronkite Journalistic Standards.
173.1551. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Cronkite Journalistic Standards", the same meaning given to the term in
section 171.200;
(2) "School-sponsored media", any material that is prepared, substantially
written, published, or broadcast by a student journalist at a public institution of higher
education in this state; distributed or generally made available to members of the
student body; and prepared under the direction of a student-media advisor. "School-
sponsored media" does not include any media intended for distribution or transmission
solely in the classroom in which the media is produced;
(3) "Student journalist", a student of a public institution of higher education
who gathers, compiles, writes, edits, photographs, records, produces, or prepares
content for dissemination in school-sponsored media;
(4) "Student-media advisor", an individual employed, appointed, or designated
by a public institution of higher education in this state to supervise or provide
instruction relating to school-sponsored media.
2. Subject to the provisions of this section, the freedom of the press in school-
sponsored media shall be protected. A student journalist has the right to exercise
freedom of speech and of the press in school-sponsored media. Material in school-
sponsored media shall not be suppressed solely because it involves political or
controversial subject matter.
3. Subject to subsection 4 of this section, a student journalist is responsible for
determining the news, opinion, feature, and advertising content of school-sponsored
media. This subsection shall not be construed to prevent a student-media advisor from
teaching professional standards of English and journalism to student journalists.
4. This section does not authorize or protect expression by a student that:
(1) Is libelous or slanderous;
(2) Constitutes an invasion of privacy;
(3) Violates federal or state law;
(4) Is likely to incite students to commit an unlawful act or to violate institution
policy or procedure; or
(5) Is likely to materially and substantially disrupt or interfere with the orderly
operation of the institution.

HCS HB 2918 5
5. Except as provided in subsection 4 of this section, a student journalist at a
public institution of higher education in this state shall not be disciplined for exercising
such student journalist's freedom of expression in school-sponsored media.
6. A student-media advisor at a public institution of higher education in this
state shall not be dismissed, suspended, disciplined, reassigned, transferred, or
otherwise retaliated against for protecting or refusing to infringe on the rights of
student journalists outlined in this section.
7. No publication or other expression of matter by students in the exercise of
rights under this section shall be deemed to be an expression of an institution's policy.
No public institution of higher education or member of the institution's governing body
or employee thereof shall be held liable in any civil or criminal action for any
publication or other expression of matter by student journalists in the exercise of rights
under this section except to the extent that such persons or entities actively participated
in the conduct that is the subject of the civil or criminal action.
8. School-sponsored media shall not be protected under this section unless the
media is a news source that conforms to the Cronkite Journalistic Standards.
9. Commentary and editorial content in school-sponsored media shall be
protected under this section as long as the content appears in a news source that
conforms to the Cronkite Journalistic Standards.
✔